District of Columbia statutes.
19-1517

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supercedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 464; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 ), but does not modify, limit, or supercede section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) ) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) ).

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 17 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).

Editor's Notes